zh-TW: 帽子貼合類型: 可調式; 彈性; 貼合; 彈性貼合; 單一尺寸; 伸縮貼合; 其他
es: Tipo de calce de la gorra: Ajustable; Elástica; Cerrada; Flex fit; Talla única; Ajuste elástico; Otro
vi: Kiểu vừa vặn của mũ: Có thể điều chỉnh; Co giãn; Vừa vặn; Flex fit; Một cỡ phù hợp với hầu hết; Ôm vừa co giãn; Khác
el: Τύπος προσαρμογής καπακιού: Ρυθμιζόμενο; Ελαστικό; Εφαρμοστό; Ελαστική εφαρμογή (Flex fit); Ένα μέγεθος για τους περισσότερους; Stretch fit; Άλλο
it: Tipo di vestibilità del cappellino: Regolabile; Elastico; Su misura; Flex fit; Taglia unica; Elasticizzato; Altro
de: Kappenpassform: Verstellbar; Elastisch; Fitted; Flex-Fit; Einheitsgröße; Stretch-Fit; Sonstige
sl-SI: Vrsta prileganja kapice: Prilagodljivo; Elastično; Po meri (fitted); Flex fit; Univerzalna velikost; Raztegljivo prileganje; Drugo
pl: Rodzaj dopasowania czapki: Regulowana; Elastyczna; Dopasowana; Flex fit; Uniwersalny rozmiar; Stretch fit; Inne
da: Dækslets pasformstype: Justerbar; Elastisk; Fitted; Flex fit; One size; Stretch fit; Andet
hr-HR: Vrsta prianjanja kape: Podesivo; Elastično; Fiksna veličina; Flex fit; Univerzalna veličina; Rastezljivo; Ostalo
pt-BR: Tipo de ajuste da tampa: Ajustável; Elástico; Sob medida; Ajuste flexível; Tamanho único; Ajuste com stretch; Outro
ko: 캡 핏 유형: 조절 가능; 신축성; 피티드; 플렉스 핏; 프리 사이즈; 스트레치 핏; 기타
pt-PT: Tipo de ajuste da touca: Ajustável; Elástico; Ajustado; Ajuste flexível; Tamanho único; Ajuste elástico; Outro
fr: Type d’ajustement du capodastre: Ajustable; Élastique; Ajusté; Flex fit; Taille unique; Coupe extensible; Autre
zh-CN: 帽子贴合类型: 可调节; 弹力; 固定尺码; 弹力贴合; 均码; 弹力款; 其他
ru: Тип посадки кепки: Регулируемая; Эластичная; По размеру; Эластичная посадка; Универсальный размер; Тянущаяся; Другое
nb: Passform-type for hette: Justerbar; Elastisk; Formsydd; Flex fit; Passer de fleste; Stretch-passform; Annet
ja: キャップフィットタイプ: サイズ調整可能; 伸縮性ゴム; フィッテッド; フレックスフィット; ワンサイズ; ストレッチフィット; その他
sk-SK: Typ uchytenia viečka: Nastaviteľný; Elastický; Na mieru; Flex fit; Univerzálna veľkosť; Stretch fit; Iný
tr: Kapak oturma tipi: Ayarlanabilir; Elastik; Kalıplı; Esnek kesim; Standart beden (çoğu kişiye uyar); Esneyebilen kesim; Diğer
ro-RO: Tipul de potrivire al capacului: Ajustabil; Elastic; Fix; Flex fit; Mărime universală; Potrivire elastică; Altele
sv: Typ av kepspassform: Justerbar; Elastisk; Måttanpassad; Flex fit; En storlek passar de flesta; Stretch fit; Annat
nl: Pasvorm pet: Verstelbaar; Elastisch; Fitted; Flex-fit; One size fits most; Stretch-fit; Overige
lt-LT: Kepuraitės modelio tipas: Reguliuojamas; Elastinis; Priglundantis; Lankstus prigludimas; Universalus dydis; Tamprus prigludimas; Kita
en: Cap fit type: Adjustable; Elastic; Fitted; Flex fit; One size fits most; Stretch fit; Other
fi: Lakin istuvuustyyppi: Säädettävä; Joustava; Mitoitettu; Flex fit; Yksi koko sopii useimmille; Joustava istuvuus; Muu
cs: Typ uchycení čepice: Nastavitelné; Elastické; Přiléhavé; Flex fit; Univerzální velikost; Stretch fit; Jiné
bg-BG: Тип прилягане на шапката: Регулируема; Еластична; По мярка; Flex fit; Универсален размер; Разтеглива; Друго
th: ประเภทของทรงหมวกวิก: ปรับได้; ยางยืด; เข้ารูป; เฟล็กซ์ฟิต; ฟรีไซส์; ยืดกระชับ; อื่นๆ
hu: Kupak rögzítési típusa: Állítható; Rugalmas; Méretre szabott; Flex fit; Univerzális méret; Stretch fit; Egyéb